Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.039

Washington state combined fund drive account—Created.

The Washington state combined fund drive account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the combined fund drive must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the beneficiaries of the Washington state combined fund drive. Only the secretary of state or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, and an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2010 c 101 s 4; 2002 c 61 s 3.]